Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7622
Rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Native American Public Health Act and shall adhere to already established or adopted and promulgated rules and regulations for contracted services under the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1070, § 18;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 62;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 685.